Hawaii statutes.
[§8-28] Outdoor Heritage Month. The
month of June shall be known and designated as "Outdoor Heritage
Month" to celebrate Hawaii's diverse natural environment and recreational
activities. [L 2014, c 12, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next